District of Columbia statutes.
2-1204.11e

Film DC Special Account Fund.

(a)

There is established as a lapsing fund the Film DC Special Account Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in subsection (b)(3) of this section. Any unexpended funds in the Film DC Special Account Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(b)

(1)

There shall be deposited into the Fund the fees derived from film permits applied for or issued pursuant to § 2-1204.11d, other funds as may be designated by law, regulation, or reprogramming, and all interest earned on all deposits.

(2)

There shall be allocated annually to the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment an amount that is equal to the total deposits and earnings that are estimated to remain unspent in the Fund at the end of the preceding fiscal year plus all deposits and earnings that are estimated to be received during the fiscal year for which the allocation is made.

(3)

The funds in the Fund shall be used solely to pay for operating expenses of the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment; provided, that no funds in the Fund shall be used for personnel or personnel-related expenses.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-290, § 2e
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2071(b), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9029, 58 DCR 6226
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-81, § 2(e), 63 DCR 768

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1204.11d.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 39-501.05.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Film DC Special Account Fund (‘Fund’), which shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in subsection (b)(3) of this section. All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b)(3) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.”
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-81 substituted “Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment” for “Office of Motion Picture and Television Development” in (b)(2) and (b)(3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2071(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2071(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).